Utah statutes.
39-1-58.   Vacating officer commissions -- Placement of officers in
reserves.
(1)  Commissions of officers of the National Guard may be vacated upon
resignation or absence without leave for three months pursuant to the sentence
of a military court.
(2) (a)  Officers of the National Guard rendered excess by the disbandment of
their organization shall be placed in the National Guard reserve.
(b)  Officers may, upon their own application, be placed in the reserve.
